Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-413. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1973, No. 72, § 1; 1975, No. 156, § 1; 1977, No. 389, § 1; 1979, No. 323, § 1; 1981, No. 838, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 469, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 615, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3115, 12-3115.1; Acts 1987, No. 743, § 1; 1989, No. 21, § 1; 1991, No. 127, § 1; 1991, No. 867, § 5; 1993, No. 904, § 1; 1995, No. 580, § 1; 1995, No. 1206, § 10; 1997, No. 183, § 4; 1997, No. 843, § 1; 1999, No. 1280, § 10; 2001, No. 185, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 12; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2015, No. 912, § 1; 2017, No. 242, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6144.

21-5-415. Nonpayment of premiums and failure to file reports by agency or school district.

(A)Penalties shall be assessed and invoiced based on the actual number of members included on the monthly billing report that is past due.

(1)If a participating entity or participating institution fails to follow established policy and procedures set by the Director of the Employee Benefits Division, including without limitation notifying the division of an insured's leave without pay, family medical leave, or military leave status or if any participating entity or participating institution provides incorrect benefit information or processes unauthorized benefit changes, including system entries that result in unreimbursed expenses to the State Employees Benefit Trust Fund or Public School Insurance Trust Fund, the division may:

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 8; 1973, No. 842, § 2; 1981, No. 749, § 4; 1981, No. 838, § 6; 1983, No. 582, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3108; Acts 1997, No. 1295, § 3; 2003, No. 826, § 2; 2007, No. 1009, § 13; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6145, 6146.

21-5-416. Annual performance audits.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall annually conduct a performance audit of the:

Entity administering claims; and

Employee Benefits Division.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment substituted “Employee Benefits Division” for “State Employees Insurance Section.”

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 redesignated part of the former undesignated paragraph as (1) and (2); and deleted “of the” from the beginning of (2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (2).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 749, § 7; 1981, No. 838, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3109.2; Acts 2003, No. 826, § 3; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 6147.

21-5-417. State contribution for employee receiving workers' compensation.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, a state agency shall remit the employer's contribution for a state employee participating in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program to the Employee Benefits Division when the state employee is:

In a leave-without-pay status because of a work-related injury; and

Receiving benefits from workers' compensation.

Amendments. The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 redesignated part of the former undesignated paragraph as (1) and (2); and, in the introductory language, inserted “for a state employee participating in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” and substituted “when the state employee is” for “for state employees when the employee is” at the end.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 711, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 14; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 6148.

21-5-418. Health savings account.

A health savings account shall be a component of a consumer-driven health insurance plan option adopted by the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board.

A school district may make an employer contribution into a participating public school employee's health savings account up to the maximum amount allowed by the Internal Revenue Service.

A school district shall ensure that any vendor the school district contracts with to provide health savings account management for the school district provides annual education to the school district's public school employees concerning the:

Advantages and disadvantages of a consumer-driven health plan option; and

Effective strategies for using a health savings account.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 669, § 12: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that immediate passage of this Act is necessary to permit employees and agencies of the state, counties, cities, towns and other political subdivisions to become parties to deferred compensation agreements. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 937, § 6: Mar. 31, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that immediate passage of this Act is necessary to permit employees and agencies of the State, counties, cities, towns and other political subdivisions to become parties to deferred compensation agreements. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 19: Apr. 9, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that provisions contained in this bill be enacted into law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1596, § 6: Apr. 13, 2001. Emergency clause provided. “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that existing law concerning public employees' deferred compensation plans does not conform with the requirements of IRC § 457; that failure to comply with these requirements may result in unintended income tax liabilities for public employees; that existing law concerning public employees' deferred compensation plans currently provides few alternatives for investing deferred compensation; that additional investment alternatives are necessary to enable public employees to maximize their earnings from deferred compensation investments. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2.

Subchapter 5

— Deferred Compensation

21-5-501. Definition.

For the purpose of this subchapter, “employee” means any person, partnership, or professional association whether appointed, elected, or under contract, providing services for the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision for which compensation is paid.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1621.

21-5-502. Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to all deferred compensation plans adopted by agencies subsequent to March 28, 1970, which shall all be subject to the rules issued by the Department of Finance and Administration under the authority granted in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 9; 1977, No. 937, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1626; Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 12; 2019, No. 315, § 2323.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas State Employee and Public School Personnel Board.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

21-5-503. Effect on other benefits.

The deferred compensation program established by this subchapter shall exist and serve in addition to retirement, pension, or benefit systems established by the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision, and no deferral of income under the deferred compensation program shall effect a reduction of any retirement, pension, or other benefit provided by law.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1623.

21-5-504. Authority of state or political subdivision.

The state or a county, city, town, or other political subdivision may agree, by contract, with an employee to defer, in whole or in part, a portion of that employee's future compensation to a deferred compensation program.

The participation of an employee in the automatic enrollment in a deferred compensation plan under § 21-5-511 is a term of an employee's employment contract.

A separate contract is not required to be executed for an employee to be enrolled in a deferred compensation plan under § 21-5-511.

The administrator of the deferred compensation program may:

Contract for, purchase, or otherwise procure annuity contracts for the deferred compensation program; and

Through a trust or custodian, contract for, purchase, or otherwise procure fixed or variable life insurance contracts, mutual funds, pooled investment funds, or such other investment vehicles that comply with state and federal laws and which permit the deferral of compensation for income tax and retirement savings purposes.

If an annuity or life insurance contract is purchased, then it must be purchased from an insurance company licensed to contract business in this state, and any insurance agent selling such contracts must be licensed by this state.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a), substituted “may, by contract, agree” for “may agree, by contract” and added “to a deferred compensation program” after “future compensation”; and rewrote (b).

The 2013 amendment added (a)(2).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas State Employee and Public School Personnel Board” in the section catchline and in (a); and substituted “The department” for “The board” in (b).

Deferrals of compensation shall be made in each instance by the appropriate disbursing officer and shall be paid over to an annuity contract or to a trust or custodial account maintained for the deferred compensation program without unreasonable delay.

The administrator of the deferred compensation program may contract with a private corporation or institution for providing trust, custodial, investment, record keeping, legal, accounting, and other administrative services, and the cost of such services may be paid from the assets of the deferred compensation program.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas State Employee and Public School Personnel Board” in (a)(1); and substituted “The Department” for “The board” in (b).

The 2001 amendment inserted “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the” in (a)(1); substituted “department, or the appropriate officer designated by the county, city, town, or other political subdivision” for “administrator of the deferred compensation program” in (b); in (c), substituted “income” for “compensation,” added “and shall be paid … without unreasonable delay” and made minor changes in punctuation; and substituted “consolidated billing and other administrative services” for “trust, custodial … compensation program” in (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

To make payments of premiums for the purchase of annuity contracts under the deferred compensation program; and

To make deferrals to a trustee or custodian holding fixed or variable life insurance contracts, annuity contracts, mutual funds, pooled investment funds, or other investment vehicles under the deferred compensation program.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas State Employee and Public School Personnel Board.”

The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1618; Acts 2001, No. 1596, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 15; 2013, No. 452, § 1.

21-5-505. Authority of Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to enter into contractual agreements with employees on behalf of the state to defer any portion of that employee's future compensation.

The department may, upon request, designate an officer or officers within any state agency, department, board, commission, or institution to enter into such contractual agreements with employees of that particular state agency, department, board, commission, or institution.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 2; 1977, No. 937, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1619; Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 13.

21-5-506. Administration of programs.

(1)The administration of the state government employees' deferred compensation program shall be under the direction of the Director of the Employee Benefits Division.

Administration of other deferred compensation programs authorized by this subchapter shall be under the direction of the appropriate officer designated by the county, city, town, or other political subdivision.

The administrator of the deferred compensation program is authorized and empowered to promulgate any and all rules deemed necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 3; 1977, No. 937, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1620; Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 14; 2001, No. 1596, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2324.

21-5-507. Payments by administrator.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration or the appropriate officer of the county, city, town, or other political subdivision designated to administer the deferred compensation program is authorized:

The payments and deferrals shall not be construed to be a prohibited use of the general assets of the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 5; 1977, No. 937, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1622; Acts 1999, No. 1280, § 15; 2001, No. 1596, § 3; 2007, No. 1009, § 16.

21-5-508. Taxation of deferred income.

A sum deferred under the deferred compensation program is not subject to income taxation until a distribution is made to the employee or beneficiary unless an employee has by contract directed that his or her contribution is to be deposited into a Roth deferred compensation plan.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1623; Acts 2007, No. 1009, § 17; 2013, No. 452, § 2.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

21-5-509. Exclusive benefit.

All amounts of compensation deferred pursuant to a deferred compensation program, all property and rights purchased with such amounts, and income attributed to such amounts, property, and rights shall be held in one (1) or more annuity contracts, custodial accounts, or in trust for the exclusive benefit of the employees and their beneficiaries participating in such a program.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1625; Acts 2001, No. 1596, § 4.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

21-5-510. Liability of state or political subdivision.

The financial liability of the state, county, city, town, or other political subdivision under a deferred compensation program authorized by this subchapter shall be limited in each instance to:

An amount determined by reference to the value of the annuity contracts which may have been purchased with respect to any employee;

An amount determined by reference to the value of the employee's interest in a trust or custodial account holding mutual funds, in pooled investment funds, or in other investment vehicles purchased on behalf of the employee; and

Any amounts deferred but not paid over to the annuity contracts, trusts, or custodial accounts.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment inserted (2) and made related changes; substituted “particular contract” for “annuity contracts” in present (1); and substituted “expended in purchase of the contracts” for “paid over to the annuity contracts, trusts, or custodial accounts” in present (3).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 669, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1624; Acts 2001, No. 1596, § 5.

21-5-511. Automatic enrollment in deferred compensation plan — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Deferred compensation plan” means the Arkansas Diamond Deferred Compensation Plan or subsequent deferred compensation plan administered by the Director of the Employee Benefits Division under this subchapter; and

“Employee” means a person employed full time by the state and the state employer participates in the Arkansas Diamond Deferred Compensation Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

“Employee” does not mean a person employed by a city, county, town, or other political subdivision that has adopted the Arkansas Diamond Deferred Compensation Plan.

An employee beginning employment or reemployment on or after January 1, 2014, shall be enrolled in the deferred compensation plan.

However, an employee may elect not to participate in the deferred compensation plan.

The amount of the contribution for an employee participating in the deferred compensation plan under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is three percent (3%) of the employee's annual compensation.

An employee may elect to contribute an amount greater than or less than the amount required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

If an employee elects not to participate in the deferred compensation plan within ninety (90) days of the employee's first contribution, the director may refund to the employee the balance of the employee's deferred compensation plan account.

The director shall provide notice to each employee subject to this section:

Within thirty (30) days of an employee's first contribution; and

At the beginning of each plan year.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate rules to:

Implement this section; and

Comply with federal law to:

Maintain the deferred compensation plan's tax qualification status by the federal government to remain tax exempt and tax qualified; and

Protect an employee's deferred compensation plan account.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (f).

A.C.R.C. Notes. The effect of Acts 1985, No. 866 (14-26-101 et seq., 14-60-101 et seq.) and this subchapter, read together, was to supersede the two preexisting laws on workers' compensation coverage for municipal and county officers (Acts 1973, Nos. 469 and 470) which were deleted from the Code.

Cross References. State Insurance Department, §23-61-101 et seq.

Workers' compensation, §11-9-101 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1979, No. 809, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that an inherent conflict exists in the processing of Public Employee workers' compensation claims because the Workers' Compensation Commission serves as both initial determiner and final arbiter of claims; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly recognizes that Public Employee workers' compensation claims are currently being administered by the Public Employee Claims Section of the Workers' Compensation Commission; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that the Public Employee compensation claims are inadequately defended against possible fraud and misuse; and

“Whereas, the General Assembly finds that the full incurred costs associated with payment of Public Employee workers' compensation claims are not routinely known;

“NOW, THEREFORE, the Legislature of the State of Arkansas recognizes the need for one single program to administer Public Employee claims for workers' compensation and enacts this measure for the achievement of that purpose.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 809, § 11: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Arkansas General Assembly that it is necessary to establish one single program for the administration of Public Employee claims for workers' compensation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 916, § 5: Mar. 30, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that ‘workfare’ projects have been recently initiated in several counties within the State thereby creating a need to immediately establish the legal status of the ‘workfare’ participants for the purpose of workers' compensation coverage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 929, § 8: Mar. 31, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Public Employee Claims Division needs clarification of State workers' compensation fund coverages for the public worker and of its duties and responsibilities under this Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 5[6]: Dec. 2, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, meeting in Extraordinary Session, that passage of this Act is necessary for continued maintenance and operation of County Roads in the State of Arkansas by increasing the appropriation to permit counties to receive available funds, and for providing an appropriation to expend funds transferred from the Military Lands Fund so that counties having lands in military reservations may receive funds as provided by law to continue critical services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 285, § 3: Mar. 7, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that workers' compensation benefits paid to injured public employees, or on their behalf, under Act 809 of 1979 are paid from funds appropriated from general revenues of the State of Arkansas, that when such injuries to a public employee are caused by the tortious conduct of a third party, the public employee, or his dependents, may make claim or maintain an action against such third party, that public employees have heretofore been successful in recovering from such third parties, or their liability carriers, but have effectively circumvented the lien claim of the State of Arkansas under Ark. Stats. Section 81-1340 by settling around the State of Arkansas pursuant to St. Paul Fire and Marine Insurance Company v. Wood, 242 Ark. 879, 416 S.W.2d 322 (1967), that this type of ‘settlement around’ the State of Arkansas has resulted in a substantial loss of general revenues, that such lien claim of the State of Arkansas should be absolute when any recovery is made from a third party, or his liability carrier, by the injured public employee or his dependents as a result of injuries for which such public employee has received workers' compensation benefits under Act 809 of 1979, whether such recovery is by settlement with or judgment against the third party, to eliminate continued losses of general revenues. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the general revenues of the State of Arkansas shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 901, § 52: Apr. 6, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present laws addressed in this omnibus Act on workers' compensation benefits and insurance licensure and other insurance regulatory issues are inadequate for the protection of the Arkansas public and immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to provide for the protection of the public. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this omnibus Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Powell, Survey of Workers' Compensation Law, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 329 (1980).

Notes, Workers' Compensation — Statute of Limitations on Seeking Additional Benefits. Mohawk Rubber Co. v. Thompson, 265 Ark. 16, 576 S.W.2d 216 (1979), 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 513 (1980).

Legislative Survey, Workers' Compensation, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 617.

Arkansas Law Survey, Baker, Workers' Compensation, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 213.

Where dual coverage exists between a private insurance company and the state workers' compensation fund for injuries incurred by the employees of a city, either one or both of the carriers are liable, but only for the benefits mandated by the act; the injured employee may not receive double payments which exceed the maximum disability benefits. City of Waldo v. Poetker, 275 Ark. 216, 628 S.W.2d 329 (1982).

Where the mayor of a city notified the Workers' Compensation Commission that the city would continue its private workers' compensation plan, but the city failed to provide the commission with a copy of its policy and was subsequently placed by the commission on the list of cities participating in the state plan, there was dual coverage and dual liability between the private insurance company and the state fund for injuries to employees of that city and the only equitable and fair way to apportion the loss was to divide it equally between the plans. City of Waldo v. Poetker, 275 Ark. 216, 628 S.W.2d 329 (1982).

The 1979 amendment to this section, which deleted a portion prohibiting judicial review in an action of the Workers' Compensation Commission with respect to a claim by a municipal employee, was a procedural one affecting the manner in which one could enforce the substantive rights conferred on claimants and employers under the Workers' Compensation Act and, thus, did not violate the prohibition under §1-2-120 against changes in substantial rights. Office of Emergency Servs. v. Home Ins. Co., 2 Ark. App. 185, 618 S.W.2d 573 (1981).

Where the claimant filed a petition for rehearing of the denial of disability benefits on the ground that there was newly discovered evidence, but it appeared that all of the evidence which he claimed was newly discovered was actually within his knowledge before the case was originally submitted to and decided by the commission, the motion for a rehearing was properly denied. Walker v. J & J Pest Control, 6 Ark. App. 171, 639 S.W.2d 748 (1982).

Inasmuch as the commission must reconsider “any compensation order, award or decision,” on its own motion or upon application of any interested party and “upon such review may make an order or award terminating, continuing, decreasing or increasing for the future the compensation previously awarded,” due process of law dictates that an employee who has been denied benefits should be afforded the same opportunity to have his claim reconsidered where he has discovered subsequently to the denial of benefits that he has a meritorious claim. Walker v. J & J Pest Control, 270 Ark. 941, 606 S.W.2d 597 (1980).

Where a city was covered by a private workers' compensation policy, but failed to furnish a copy to the Workers' Compensation Commission by a specified date, two widows of city policemen were entitled to coverage from both the private plan and the municipal aid fund under this section since this section automatically extends state fund coverage to city employees in workers' compensation cases unless there is strict compliance with all the exclusionary provisions of the fund act; the failure of the city to strictly comply with the fund act's exclusionary provisions mandates a finding of coincidental or dual coverage and, consequently, dual liability. City of Waldo v. Poetker, 3 Ark. App. 12, 621 S.W.2d 491 (1981), aff'd, 275 Ark. 216, 628 S.W.2d 329 (1982).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 452, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 3497.

Subchapter 6

— Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act

21-5-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3603.

21-5-602. Legislative intent.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to:

Provide workers' compensation coverage through state funds for all public employees, as defined in this subchapter, who are not otherwise covered under a workers' compensation liability insurance policy written and issued by a private workers' compensation liability carrier;

Consolidate the administration of benefits for the public employees covered by state funds;

Consolidate the legal representation and defense of the state workers' compensation funds; and

Establish and define the Public Employee Claims Division of the State Insurance Department as the unit of state government charged with payments of benefits provided by this subchapter.

Cited: South Cent. Ark. Drug Task Force v. Ray, 56 Ark. App. 30, 937 S.W.2d 682 (1997).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 2; 1981, No. 929, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3602.

21-5-603. Definitions.

The term “public employee”, as used in this subchapter, includes:

State employees and officers of any state agency, board, commission, department, institution, college, university, or community college receiving an appropriation for regular salaries, extra help, or authorized overtime payable from funds deposited into the State Treasury or depositories other than the State Treasury by the General Assembly, provided that inmates of state correctional facilities who perform work for the state while incarcerated or while on a work-release program shall not be considered state employees;

Public school employees and officers of the various school districts of this state;

Municipal employees and officers of the municipalities of this state, and the employees of any board, commission, department, or institution owned, operated, managed, and administered by the municipalities.

However, employees of municipally owned hospitals and nursing homes operated, managed, or administered by private management companies or enterprises, whether under a contract for management, or under a lease agreement, or under any other type of management arrangement, are not public employees within the meaning of this subchapter and shall not be provided state fund coverage for workers' compensation benefits under the provisions of this subchapter;

County employees and officers of the counties of this state, and the employees of any board, commission, department, or institution owned, operated, managed, or administered by the counties, including employees of county-owned hospitals and nursing homes operated, managed, or administered by private management companies or enterprises under a management agreement under the terms of which the employees retain their employment status as county employees.

However, employees of county-owned hospitals and nursing homes operated, managed, or administered by private management companies or enterprises under a lease agreement or under a contract of management in which the managing company uses its own personnel, shall not be provided state fund coverage for workers' compensation benefits under the provisions of this subchapter; and

Emergency services volunteer workers duly qualified and registered as provided in § 12-75-129 when such emergency services volunteer workers are acting subject to the order, control, or pursuant to a request of, and under the supervision and instruction of the Governor, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, or the chief executive officer of a county or local government unit making use of emergency service volunteer workers.

The term “public employer”, as used in this subchapter, means:

Any state agency, board, commission, department, institution, college, university, or community college receiving appropriation for regular salaries, extra help, and authorized overtime payable from funds deposited in the State Treasury or depositories other than the State Treasury by the General Assembly;

Any municipality of the State of Arkansas or any department, board, commission, or institution owned, operated, managed, and administered by a municipality of the State of Arkansas.

Any municipal hospital or nursing home operated, managed, or administered by a private management company or enterprise, whether under a contract for management, under a lease agreement, or under any other type of management arrangement, is a private employer and not entitled to workers' compensation coverage under the provisions of this subchapter.

Any unincorporated city or town shall not be deemed to be a public employer and shall not have workers' compensation liability coverage for its employees under the provisions of this subchapter;

Any county of the State of Arkansas or any department, board, commission, or institution owned, operated, managed, and administered by a county of the State of Arkansas.

However, any county hospital or nursing home operated, managed, or administered by a private management company or enterprise, whether under a contract for management, or under a lease agreement, or under any other type of management arrangement, is a private employer and not entitled to workers' compensation coverage under the provisions of this subchapter;

Any of the various school districts in the State of Arkansas; and

The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management and any local government unit making use of emergency service volunteer workers.

The term “reserve value”, as used in this subchapter, means the present value of all payments to be made to or on behalf of any public employee claimant based upon such reasonable tables of experience and regular interest as the Director of the Public Employee Claims Division shall adopt from time to time.

The term “director”, as used in this subchapter, shall refer to the Director of the Public Employee Claims Division.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(5) and (b)(5).

Cross References. Workers' compensation, §11-9-101 et seq.

An employee of the South Central Arkansas Drug Task Force was a state employee and entitled to benefits under this subchapter. South Cent. Ark. Drug Task Force v. Ray, 56 Ark. App. 30, 937 S.W.2d 682 (1997).

Cited: Rose v. Arkansas State Police, 479 U.S. 1, 107 S. Ct. 334, 93 L. Ed. 2d 183 (1986).

The division shall determine in every claim where compensation is awarded the reserve value of such claim.

Annually, on June 30 of each fiscal period, the director shall prepare a report which states the total of all reserve values established for the claims filed in that fiscal period and the total amount of moneys disbursed for payment of claims during that same period.

The report shall be submitted to the Insurance Commissioner between June 30 and September 30.

In each case where a claim for workers' compensation benefits is made under this subchapter, the division shall investigate the claim to ensure that the compensation benefits paid are justified by the facts of the claim and the reserve values for the claim established accordingly.

The division shall in all appropriate cases pursue the recovery of benefits paid to public employees from third parties pursuant to § 11-9-410.

The making of a claim for compensation against any public employer or the division for the injury or death of a public employee shall not affect the right of the public employee, or his or her dependents, to make claim or maintain an action in tort against any third party for the injury.

In such event, the rights of the public employee, or his or her dependents, the public employer, and the division shall be governed by the provisions of § 11-9-410, provided, the rights of the public employer and the division in and to amounts received from the third party by the injured public employee, or his or her dependents, as a result of either settlement with or judgment against the third party shall be absolute.

Cited: Public Emple. Claims Div. v. Clark, 2018 Ark. App. 215 (2018).

The Director of the Public Employee Claims Division shall appoint lawyers of recognized ability admitted to practice in all state courts.

The lawyers shall be the attorneys for the Public Employees Claims Division and shall represent the public employer before the Workers' Compensation Commission in any claim filed pursuant to this subchapter and shall perform such other duties as the director may designate.

The attorneys of any state agency, department, or institution against which a workers' compensation claim is filed by an employee may represent their respective agencies before the commission and in the courts of this state with respect to claims filed under this subchapter against their agencies, departments, or institutions, provided that the representation and defense of the state workers' compensation funds, administered by the division, shall be coordinated with the attorneys for the division and shall be under the supervision of the director.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 809, § 1; 1981, No. 929, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3601; Acts 1993, No. 901, § 4; 1999, No. 646, §§ 63, 64.